Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.390

Penalty—General.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of the chapter for which no specific penalty has been provided herein, shall be subject to prosecution before any court of competent jurisdiction, and shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1986 c 259 s 38; 1935 c 112 s 16; RRS s 10031-16. Prior: 1901 c 152 s 4; 1893 c 55 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.